th: โซนที่ปรับได้: เท้า; ศีรษะ; ความสูง (สูง-ต่ำ); หลังส่วนล่าง; การเอียงหมอน; แบบเลื่อนชิดผนัง/Wallhugger; อื่นๆ
cs: Nastavitelné zóny: Nohy; Hlava; Výška (Hi-Low); Bedra; Náklon polštáře; Wall-Glide / Wallhugger; Ostatní
hu: Állítható zónák: Láb; Fej; Magasság (Hi-Low); Derék; Párnadöntés; Falhoz igazodó (Wallhugger); Egyéb
el: Ρυθμιζόμενες ζώνες: Πόδια; Κεφάλι; Ύψος (Hi-Low); Οσφυϊκή περιοχή; Κλίση μαξιλαριού; Wall-Glide/Wallhugger; Άλλο
lt-LT: Reguliuojamos zonos: Kojų; Galvos; Aukštis (aukštas-žemas); Juosmens; Pagalvės pokrypis; Slydimas prie sienos („Wall-Glide“ / „Wallhugger“); Kita
hr-HR: Prilagodljive zone: Stopala; Glava; Visina (visoko/nisko); Lumbalni dio; Nagib jastuka; Klizanje uza zid / ušteda prostora; Ostalo
it: Zone regolabili: Piedi; Testa; Altezza (alto-basso); Lombare; Inclinazione cuscino; Scorrimento a parete; Altro
zh-TW: 可調式區域: 腳部; 頭部; 高度 (高-低); 腰部; 枕頭傾斜度; 零靠牆/貼牆; 其他
es: Zonas ajustables: Pies; Cabeza; Altura (alta/baja); Lumbar; Inclinación de almohada; Deslizante de pared; Otro
fr: Zones réglables: Pieds; Tête; Hauteur (haut-bas); Lombaires; Inclinaison de l’oreiller; Dos au mur; Autre
vi: Các khu vực có thể điều chỉnh: Chân; Đầu; Chiều cao (Cao-Thấp); Thắt lưng; Nghiêng gối; Trượt áp tường/Wallhugger; Khác
ro-RO: Zone reglabile: Picior; Cap; Înălțime (Înalt-Jos); Lombar; Înclinare pernă; Glisare pe perete/Lipire de perete; Altele
da: Justerbare zoner: Fod; Hoved; Højde (høj/lav); Lænd; Pudehældning; Wall-glide/wallhugger; Anden
sv: Justerbara zoner: Fot; Huvud; Höjd (Hi-Low); Svank; Kuddvinkling; Wall-Glide/Wallhugger; Övrigt
nl: Verstelbare zones: Voet; Hoofd; Hoogte (hoog-laag); Lendenen; Kussenkanteling; Wall-Glide/Wallhugger; Overig
ko: 조절 가능한 영역: 발; 머리; 높이(상/하); 요추; 베개 기울기; 월 글라이드/월 허거; 기타
de: Einstellbare Zonen: Fuß; Kopf; Höhe (Hoch-Tief); Lendenwirbelsäule; Kopfneigung; Wall-Glide/Wallhugger; Andere
sl-SI: Nastavljive cone: Noge; Glava; Višina (visoko-nizko); Križni predel; Nagib vzglavnika; Drsenje ob steni (Wall-Glide/Wallhugger); Drugo
pl: Regulowane strefy: Stopy; Głowa; Wysokość (góra-dół); Odcinek lędźwiowy; Nachylenie poduszki; Wall-Glide/Wallhugger; Inne
pt-PT: Zonas ajustáveis: Pé; Cabeça; Altura (alta-baixa); Lombar; Inclinação da almofada; Deslizamento na parede/wallhugger; Outro
tr: Ayarlanabilir bölgeler: Ayak; Baş; Yükseklik (Yüksek-Alçak); Bel; Yastık eğimi; Duvara sıfır kayma; Diğer
sk-SK: Nastaviteľné zóny: Nohy; Hlava; Výška (vysoká/nízka); Bedrá; Sklon vankúša; Posuv k stene (Wall-Glide/Wallhugger); Iné
ru: Регулируемые зоны: Ноги; Голова; Высота (Hi-Low); Поясница; Наклон подушки; Wall-Glide/Wallhugger; Другое
nb: Justerbare soner: Fot; Hode; Høyde (høy-lav); Korsrygg; Putetilt; Wall-Glide / Wallhugger; Annet
fi: Säädettävät vyöhykkeet: Jalka; Pää; Korkeus (ylä-ala); Ristiselkä; Tyynyn kallistus; Wall-Glide / Wallhugger; Muu
en: Adjustable zones: Foot; Head; Height (Hi-Low); Lumbar; Pillow Tilt; Wall-Glide/Wallhugger; Other
zh-CN: 可调节区域: 脚部; 头部; 高度（高-低）; 腰部; 枕头倾斜; 靠墙滑动/紧贴墙壁; 其他
bg-BG: Регулируеми зони: Крака; Глава; Височина (високо-ниско); Лумбална зона; Наклон на възглавницата; Плъзгане до стената (Wallhugger); Други
pt-BR: Zonas ajustáveis: Pés; Cabeça; Altura (Alto-Baixo); Lombar; Inclinação do travesseiro; Deslizamento de parede (Wall-Glide); Outros
ja: 調整可能なゾーン: 足; 頭; 高さ (ハイ/ロー); 腰部 (ランバー); ピローチルト; ウォールグライド/ウォールハガー; その他